South Dakota, session 2026, HB1279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 3-6E-1 be AMENDED:
3-6E-1. The bureau may establish a benefits plan for plan-eligible employees of
the state and technical college employees, pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The plan may
either be self-funded or established as a group health insurance program. The plan may
provide for group health coverage against the financial cost of hospital, surgical,
pharmacy, and medical treatment and care, and any other coverage or benefits the human
resources commissioner determines is appropriate and desirable. The human resources
commissioner may include a flexible benefit plan which that allows an employee to choose
the employee's own benefits or levels of coverage.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 3-6E:
Notwithstanding any other sections of law, a technical college may join the plan on
terms and conditions agreed upon by the human resources commissioner and the
president of the technical college.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, a technical college employee who
participates in the plan is considered a plan-eligible employee and a member of the plan
under this chapter.
In lieu of the monthly state contribution described in § 3-6E-8, the LEA, as defined
in § 13-39A-1, that employs a technical college employee shall contribute to the system
an amount no less than the monthly contribution provided by the state for other plan-
eligible employees.
In lieu of a payroll deduction by the state, as described under § 3-6E-9, a technical
college participating in the plan may deduct from an employee's salary, and pay to the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.840.10 2 1279
state treasurer any premium or contribution required by the human resources
commissioner, pursuant to § 3-6E-9.
For the purpose of this chapter "technical college employee" means an individual
who is a permanent employee of a technical college in this state, as listed in § 13-39A-
42, and who is scheduled to work twenty or more hours a week, at least six months of
each year.
Section 3. That § 3-6E-8 be AMENDED:
3-6E-8. The State of South DakotaThe state shall either make a monthly
contribution to the system or otherwise provide for the amount necessary to make
payment to the system for the full single rate monthly health insurance premium or
contribution for the plan with the lowest actuarial value for each plan-eligible employee,
except for a technical college employee, pursuant to section 2 of this Act. This amount
shall must be transmitted to the account of the state employees' benefits plan in the Office
of the State Treasurer. The state treasurer, after making a record of the receipts, shall
credit the plan with an amount equal to that remitted or otherwise provided. Costs beyond
this amount for other plans offered by the state shall must be paid by the employee
through premiums. After the contribution has been assigned to the plan, the bureau shall
disburse the contribution in accordance with this chapter and the rules promulgated
pursuant to chapter 1-26 by the human resources commissioner.
Section 4. That § 3-6E-9 be AMENDED:
3-6E-9. The State of South DakotaThe state shall deduct on each payroll of a
member, except for a member who is a technical college employee pursuant to section 2
of this Act, for each payroll period, the amount of the contribution or premium, including
any administrative expense. The state shall make deductions from salaries of plan-eligible
employees, except for technical college employees, pursuant to section 2 of this Act, and
shall transmit monthly the amount specified to be deducted to the state treasurer. The
state treasurer, after making a record of receipts, shall credit the benefits plan with an
amount equal to that remitted by the state. After the credit has been assigned to the
benefits plan, the human resources commissioner shall disburse credit in accordance with
this chapter and the rules promulgated pursuant to chapter 1-26 by the human resources
commissioner.
Section 5. That § 3-6E-13 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.840.10 3 1279
3-6E-13. The human resources commissioner is responsible for the administration
of this chapter and shall promulgate rules required for the effective administration of the
provisions of this chapter pursuant to chapter 1-26. The rules may be promulgated in the
following areas:
(1) To establish what benefits will are to be offered pursuant to this chapter;
(2) Participation in the plan by employees, retired employees, technical college
employees, and dependents;
(3) Procedures for election of coverage;
(4) Effective dates of coverage if not specified by statute;
(5) Termination of coverage;
(6) Changes in dependent coverage;
(7) Collection of premiums and contributions;
(8) To coordinate the benefits plan with the health insurance plan authorized in this
chapter; and
(9) Other provisions as required to meet federal law.
Section 6. This Act is effective beginning July 1, 2027.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.